Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7988.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-38 of the General Laws entitled "Inspection of Motor Vehicles"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-38-3.1. Electric vehicle inspection and fees.
Beginning in fiscal year 2027, a fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00) is to be charged for each
battery electric motor vehicle safety inspection. The amount of fees collected shall provide for the
cost of the inspection and other costs provided by law. The fee must be paid for each motor vehicle
inspected at an inspection station at the time of the inspection and is payable whether a compliance
certificate, waiver certificate, or no certificate is issued. There shall be no fee charged for one
reinspection of a vehicle that failed an initial inspection when the reinspection is conducted at the
authorized inspection repair station (AIRS) that conducted the initial inspection. Of the fifteen
dollar ($15.00) fee, ten dollars ($10.00) shall be retained by the inspection station owner to cover
the costs of performing the inspection. The remaining five dollars ($5.00) shall be remitted to the
program manager.
SECTION 2. Section 31-47.1-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-47.1 entitled "Motor
Vehicle Emissions Inspection Program" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-47.1-3. Inspection requirement.
(a) Each motor vehicle subject to the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to a motor
vehicle emissions inspection, conducted no more frequently than annually. Different classes of
motor vehicles or model years may be subject to different inspection frequencies.

(b) Motor vehicles subject to this chapter shall be determined by regulations, and shall
include, but not necessarily be limited to, all 1975 and later model year light duty vehicles and light
duty years trucks up to and including eight thousand five hundred pounds (8,500 lbs.) regardless of
the gross vehicle weight rating.
(c) Any motor vehicle which is inspected and found not to comply with the standards and
criteria for motor vehicle emissions inspections must, within thirty (30) days of the inspection, be
re-inspected and found to comply with the standards and criteria for motor vehicle emissions
inspections, or have received a waiver certificate, or not be operated on the highways of the state.
(d) Any certificate issued under this chapter shall always be carried in an easily accessible
place in or about the vehicle for which the certificate was issued.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005783
========
LC005783 - Page 2 of 3